hr-HR: Vrsta cijevi za koju je prikladno: Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Lijevano željezo; Klorirani polivinil klorid (CPVC); Bakar; Pocinčani čelik; Višeslojni; PEX; Polivinil klorid (PVC); Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
vi: Phù hợp với loại ống: Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Chảo gang; Chlorinated polyvinyl chloride (CPVC); Màu đồng đỏ; Thép mạ kẽm; Nhiều lớp; PEX; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Thép không gỉ; Khác
ru: Для какого типа труб: Акрилонитрилбутадиенстирол (АБС); Чугун; Хлорированный поливинилхлорид (ХПВХ); Медь; Оцинкованная сталь; Многослойный; PEX; Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
nb: Egnet for rørtype: Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Støpejern; Klorert polyvinylklorid (CPVC); Kobber; Galvanisert stål; Flerlag; PEX; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Rustfritt stål; Annen
sv: Lämplig för rörtyp: Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Gjutjärn; Klorerad polyvinylklorid (CPVC); Koppar; Galvaniserat stål; Flerlager; PEX; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Rostfritt stål; Annat
da: Velegnet til rørtype: Acrylonitril-butadien-styren (ABS); Støbejern; Kloreret polyvinylchlorid (CPVC); Kobber; Galvaniseret stål; Flerlag; PEX; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Rustfrit stål; Andet
fr: Convient au type de tuyau: Acrylonitrile butadiène styrène (ABS); Fonte; Chlorure de polychlorure de vinyle; Cuivre; Acier aluminisé; Multicouche; PEX; Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Acier inoxydable; Autre
lt-LT: Tinka vamzdžių tipui: Akrilnitrilo butadieno stirenas (ABS); Ketus; Chloruotas polivinilchloridas (CPVC); Varis; Galvanizuotas plienas; Daugiasluoksnis; PEX; Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ potrubia: Akrylonitrilbutadiénstyrén (ABS); Liatina; Chlórovaný polyvinylchlorid (CPVC); Meď; Pozinkovaná oceľ; Viacvrstvový; PEX; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип тръба: Акрилонитрил-бутадиен-стирол (ABS); Чугун; Хлориран поливинилхлорид (CPVC); Мед; Поцинкована стомана; Многослоен; PEX; Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Неръждаема стомана; Други
hu: Csőtípus: Akrilnitril-butadién-sztirol (ABS); Öntöttvas; Klórozott polivinil-klorid (CPVC); Réz; Horganyzott acél; Többrétegű; PEX; Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
zh-CN: 适用管材类型: 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 铸铁; 氯化聚氯乙烯 (CPVC); 铜色; 镀锌钢; 多层; PEX; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 不锈钢; 其他
pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de tubo: Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Ferro fundido; Cloreto de polivinilo clorado (CPVC); Cobre; Aço galvanizado; Multicamada; PEX; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Aço inoxidável; Outro
it: Tipo di tubo ideale: Acrilonitrile butadiene stirene (ABS); Ghisa; Cloruro di polivinile clorurato (CPVC); Rame; Acciaio galvanizzato; Multistrato; PEX; Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
en: Suitable for pipe type: Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Cast iron; Chlorinated polyvinyl chloride (CPVC); Copper; Galvanized steel; Multilayer; PEX; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Stainless steel; Other
zh-TW: 適用管道類型: 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 鑄鐵; 氯化聚氯乙烯 (CPVC); 紅銅色; 鍍鋅鋼; 多層; PEX; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 不銹鋼; 其他
th: เหมาะสำหรับประเภทท่อ: อะคริโลไนไตรลบิวตาไดอีนสไตรีน (ABS); เหล็กหล่อ; คลอโรลิเนตเต็ดโพลีไวนิลคลอไรด์ (CPVC); สีทองแดง; เหล็กกล้ากัลวาไนซ์; หลายชั้น; PEX; โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); เหล็กสเตนเลส; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de țevi: Acrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Fontă; Policlorură de vinil clorură (CPVC); Cupru; Otel galvanizat; Multistrat; PEX; Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
pl: Typ odpowiedni dla rury: Akrylonitryl-butadien-styren (ABS); Żeliwo; Chlorowany polichlorek winylu (CPVC); Miedź; Stal cynkowana; Wielowarstwowe; PEX; Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Stal nierdzewna; Pozostałe
es: Adecuado para tipo de plaga: Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Hierro fundido; Cloruro de polivinilo clorado (CPVC); Cobre; Acero galvanizado; Multicapa; PEX; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Acero inoxidable; Otros
ja: パイプタイプに適している: アクリロニトリルブタジエンスチレン (ABS); 鋳鉄; 塩素化ポリ塩化ビニル (CPVC); コッパー; 亜鉛メッキスチール; マルチレイヤー; PEX; ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ステンレススチール; その他
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto cevi: Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Lito železo; Kloriran polivinilklorid (CPVC); Baker; Pocinkano jeklo; Večplastna; PEX; Polivinilklorid (PVC); Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
cs: Vhodný typ trubky: Akrylonitril butadien styren (ABS); Železná litina; Chlorovaný polyvinylchlorid (CPVC); Měděná; Galvanizovaná ocel; Vícevrstvý; PEX; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Nerezová ocel; Jiné
nl: Geschikt voor leidingtype: Acrylonitril-butadieen-styreen (ABS); Gietijzer; Gechloreerd polyvinylchloride (CPVC); Koper; Gegalvaniseerd metaal; Meerlaags; PEX; Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Roestvrij staal; Andere
de: Geeignet für diesen Rohrtyp: Acrylnitril-Butadien-Styrol (ABS); Gusseisen; Chloriertes Polyvinylchlorid (CPVC); Kupfer; Galvanisierter Stahl; Mehrschichtig; PEX; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Edelstahl; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Adequado para tipo de tubo: Acrilonitrila butadieno estireno (ABS); Ferro fundido; Cloreto de polivinila clorado (CPVC); Cobre; Aço galvanizado; Multicamada; PEX; Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Aço inoxidável; Outro
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο σωλήνα: Ακρυλονιτρίλιο βουταδιένιο στυρόλιο (ABS); Χυτοσίδηρος; Χλωριωμένο πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (CPVC); Χαλκός; Γαλβανισμένος χάλυβας; Πολυστρωματικό; PEX; Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
ko: 적합한 파이프 유형: 아크릴로니트릴 부타디엔 스티렌(ABS); 주철; 염소화 폴리염화비닐(CPVC); 구리; 아연도금강; 다층; PEX; 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
tr: Boru Tipine Uygun: Akrilonitril bütadien stiren (ABS); Dökme demir; Klorlu polivinil klorür (CPVC); Bakır; Galvanize çelik; Çok katmanlı; PEX; Polivinil klorür (PVC); Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
fi: Soveltuu putkityyppiin: Akryylinitriilibutadieenistyreeni (ABS); Valurauta; Kloorattu polyvinyylikloridi (CPVC); Kupari; Galvanoitu teräs; Monikerroksinen; PEX; Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Ruostumaton teräs; Muu